California statutes. Water Code
(b) Forty percent of the money in the subaccount shall be allocated to projects in counties not described in subdivision (a).

(c) This section does not apply to Section 79114.2 or
 Section 79117.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79115.

The board may adopt regulations to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79116.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79117.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79113, the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board, after consultation with the Department of Pesticide Regulation and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, for grants as follows:

(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000)
 for research and source identification.

(2) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for mitigation measures to protect water quality from potential adverse effects of pesticides, which measures have the ability to provide benefits for a period of 20 years, as determined by the board after consultation with the Department of Pesticide Regulation and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Clean Water Program [79120. - 79133.]

79120.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Eligible project” means a project or activity described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13480 that is all of the following:

(1) Necessary to prevent water pollution, reclaim water, or improve water quality.

(2) Eligible for funds from the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount or federal assistance.

(3) Certified by the board as entitled to priority over other eligible projects.

(4) Complies with applicable water quality standards, policies, and plans.

(b) “Federal assistance” means money provided to a municipality, either directly or through allocation by the state, from the federal government to construct eligible projects pursuant to the Clean Water Act.

(c) “Municipality” has the same meaning as defined in the Clean Water Act and also includes the state or any agency, department, or political subdivision thereof, and applicants eligible for technical assistance under Section 319 (33 U.S.C.
 Sec. 1329) or grants under Section 320 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1330).

(d) “Small community” means a municipality with a population of 10,000 persons or less, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality where the segment of the population is 10,000 persons or less, with a financial hardship as determined by the board.

(e) “Treatment works” has the same meaning as defined in the Clean Water Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79121.

There is hereby created in the account all of the following subaccounts:

(a) The State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount.

(b) The Small Communities Grant Subaccount.

(c) The Wastewater Construction Grant Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79122.

The following amounts are hereby transferred from the account to the following subaccounts and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the board, as follows:

(a) Thirty million five hundred thousand dollars ($30,500,000) to the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount for the purposes of providing loans pursuant to the Clean Water Act, to aid in the construction or implementation of eligible
 projects, and for the purposes described in Section 79124.

(b) Thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) to the Small Communities Grant Subaccount for grants by the board to small communities for construction of eligible treatment works, and for the purposes described in Section 79124.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 6.3.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79122.2.

The sum of thirty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($35,500,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the Wastewater Construction Grant Subaccount and, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board for the purposes of providing grants to aid in the construction of treatment works for the Cities of Manteca, Stockton, Tracy, and Orange Cove.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79122.4.

The board may transfer unallocated funds from the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount to the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 13477 for the purposes of meeting federal requirements for state matching funds to provide loans in accordance with the Clean Water Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79123.

The board may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79124.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary or desirable to carry out this article, and may prepare recommendations with regard thereto, including the preparation of comprehensive statewide or areawide studies and reports on the collection, treatment, and disposal of waste, and wastewater recycling. For the purposes of this section, “research” may include the design, acquisition, installation, or construction of monitoring and
 testing equipment and related facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79125.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in each subaccount created pursuant to this article may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79126.

Not more than 2 percent of the total amount deposited in each subaccount under this article may be used for the purposes of Section 79124.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79127.

For the purposes of implementing subdivision (a) of Section 79122, the board may make loans to municipalities, pursuant to contract, to aid in the construction or implementation of eligible projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79128.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 79122, the board may make grants to small communities so that any state grant does not exceed 9712 percent of the eligible cost of necessary studies, planning, design, and construction of the eligible project determined in accordance with applicable state law and regulations.

(b) The total amount of grants made
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 79122, for any single project, may not exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 6.7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79128.5.

For the purposes of Section 79122.2, the board may make grants for the cost of planning, design, and construction of treatment works necessary to comply with waste discharge requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 6.9.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79129.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this article for a loan or grant may include provisions determined by the board, and shall include all of the following provisions:

(a) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the project.

(b) A description of the type of assistance being offered.

(c) An agreement by the
 board to pay to the municipality or small community, during the progress of the project or following completion, as agreed upon by the parties, the amount specified in the contract determined pursuant to applicable federal and state laws.

(d) An agreement by the municipality or small community to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project, commence operation of the project upon completion, properly operate and maintain the project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, and provide for payment of its share of the costs of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79130.

All contracts entered into pursuant to this article for loans or grants are subject to both of the following requirements:

(a) Municipalities seeking assistance shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the board, that an adequate opportunity for public participation regarding the project has been provided.

(b) Any election held with respect to the project shall include
 the voters of the entire municipality unless the municipality proposes to accept the assistance on behalf of a specified portion or portions of the municipality, in which case the election shall be held in that portion or portions of the municipality only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79131.

Any loan made pursuant to Section 79127 shall meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 13480.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79132.

All principal and interest payments received pursuant to loan contracts entered into pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount for the purposes of entering into additional loans under this article, and shall not be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79133.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, of the continuously appropriated funds described in subdivision (a) of Section 79122, the sum of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) shall be used by the Department of Toxic Substances Control for allocation to local agencies for groundwater remediation projects.

(b) The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 6.10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Water Recycling Program [79135. - 79147.]

79135.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Municipality” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 79120.

(b) “Subaccount” means the Water Recycling Subaccount created by Section 79136.

(c) “Water recycling
 project” means a water recycling project that meets applicable reclamation criteria and water reclamation requirements and that complies with applicable water quality standards, policies, and plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79136.

There is hereby created in the account the Water Recycling Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79137.

(a) The sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of this article.

(b) (1) Sixty percent of the money in the subaccount shall be allocated to projects in the Counties of Riverside, Ventura, Los Angeles, San Diego, Orange, or San Bernardino.

(2) Forty
 percent of the money in the subaccount shall be allocated to projects in counties not described in paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79138.

Unallocated funds remaining in the Water Recycling Subaccount in the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund on March 8, 2000, and any funds deposited into that subaccount after that date, shall be transferred to, and all money repaid to the state pursuant to any loan contract executed under Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 14050) of Division 7 or Article 3 (commencing with Section 78620) of Chapter 5 of Division 24 shall be deposited in, the
 subaccount for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79139.

The board may enter into an agreement with the federal government for federal contributions to the subaccount if all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The board has identified any required matching funds.

(b) The board is prepared to commit to the expenditure of any minimum amount in the subaccount in the manner required by the Clean Water Act.

(c) Any agreement between the board and the federal government is consistent with the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79140.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, 50 percent of the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the board for loans to municipalities for the design and construction of water recycling projects in accordance with Section 79141, and for the purposes described in Sections 79143, 79144, and 79145.

(b) Fifty percent of the money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to
 the board, may be used by the board for grants to municipalities for the design and construction of water recycling projects in accordance with Section 79141.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79141.

The board may enter into agreements with municipalities for loans and grants for projects to recycle water in accordance with this article. Criteria to be considered by the board in determining whether to enter into an agreement under this article may include, but are not limited to, whether the project is a cost-effective means to meet the state or local water supply needs, when compared to other sources of water supply that may be available to the municipality, whether the project is necessary to
 protect water quality, the readiness of the municipality to proceed with the design and construction of water recycling projects, the degree to which the recycled water improves water supply reliability, water quality, ecosystem restoration, and other environmental benefits, the net water savings benefit, the degree to which the recycled water would reduce water supply demands on the bay-delta system, the Colorado River, or other water systems critical to regional or statewide water supply, the ability to encourage development of new water recycling projects, and the amount of funding that the municipality is requesting under this article. The cost effectiveness of a project when compared to other sources of state or local water supply shall not be the sole factor in determining whether to enter into an agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79142.

An agreement entered into pursuant to Section 79141 may include those provisions determined by the board to be necessary for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79142.2.

(a) A contract for a loan made pursuant to this article may not provide for a moratorium on, or the deferment of, the payment of the principal of, or interest on, the loan.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to Section 79141 shall be for a period not to exceed 20 years.

(c) The board may enter into a contract for a loan that equals up to 100 percent of
 the total eligible cost of design and construction of an eligible recycling project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79142.4.

(a) The board may establish the interest rate for a loan made pursuant to this article at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method.

(b) If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher
 multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent.

(c) The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79142.6.

All principal and interest payments received pursuant to loan contracts executed pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the subaccount for the purposes of this article, and shall not be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79142.8.

All interest earned by assets in the subaccount shall be deposited in the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79143.

The board may make grants to municipalities for facility planning studies for water recycling projects. The amount of the grants may not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79144.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary or desirable to carry out this article, and may prepare recommendations with regard thereto, including the preparation of comprehensive statewide or areawide studies and reports on the collection, treatment, and disposal of waste and wastewater recycling. For the purposes of this section, “research” may include the design, acquisition, installation, or construction of monitoring and
 testing equipment and related facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79145.

(a) Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article. 

(b) Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used for the purposes of Section 79144.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79146.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the money in the subaccount may not be used to provide financial assistance to any water recycling project used to augment water supplies by discharging recycled water into a surface water reservoir that supplies water directly to a treatment facility for a water supply system that serves domestic uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79147.

(a) The board may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(b) The board is encouraged to expedite the review and processing of agreements to carry out the purposes of this article. The board shall report to the Legislature on the progress of implementing this article on or before June 30, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Coastal Nonpoint Source Control Program [79148. - 79148.16.]

79148.

The purpose of this article is to provide funding for projects that restore and protect the water quality and environment of coastal waters, estuaries, bays, and near shore waters and groundwaters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.2.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Educational institution” means community colleges, state colleges, and the University of California.

(b) “Local public agency” means any city, county, city and county, district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(c) “Municipality” has the same meaning as defined in the Clean Water Act and also includes the state or any agency, department, or political subdivision thereof, and applicants eligible for technical assistance under Section 319 (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329) or grants under Section 320 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1330).

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means any California corporation organized under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) “Regional board” means a regional water quality control board.

(f) “Subaccount” means the Coastal Nonpoint Source Control Subaccount created by Section 79148.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.4.

There is hereby created in the account the Coastal Nonpoint Source Control Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.6.

The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000), upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, shall be allocated by the board to the City of Huntington Beach to fund multiagency studies to establish recommendations to address coastal nonpoint source pollution in the tidal marshes and coastal waters, and to implement those recommendations. Agencies authorized to conduct the studies and implement the recommendations may include, but need not
 be limited to, municipal and county governments, flood control districts, and sanitation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.8.

(a) The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, may be used by the board, in consultation with the California Coastal Commission, to award loans as provided in subdivision (b), and to award grants not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project, to municipalities, local public agencies, educational institutions, or nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this article. Grants may be awarded for any of the following projects:

(1) A project designed to improve water quality at public beaches and to make improvements for the purpose of ensuring that coastal waters adjacent to public beaches meet the bacteriological standards set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 115875) of Chapter 5 of Part 10 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A project to provide comprehensive capability for monitoring, collecting, and analyzing ambient water quality, including monitoring technology that can be entered into a statewide information base with standardized protocols and sampling, collection, storage and retrieval procedures.

(3) A project to make improvements to existing sewer collection systems and septic systems for the restoration and protection of coastal water quality.

(4) A project designed to implement storm water and runoff pollution reduction and prevention programs for the restoration and protection of coastal water quality.

(5) A project that is consistent with the state’s nonpoint source control program, as revised to meet the requirements of Section 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Act Reauthorization Amendments of 1990, Section 319 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1329), and the requirements of Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000).

(b) In addition to the grants authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), the board may make loans not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project to municipalities, local public agencies, educational institutions, or nonprofit organizations for the purposes set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) The projects funded from the subaccount shall demonstrate the capability of contributing to sustained, long-term water quality or environmental restoration or protection benefits for a period of 20 years, shall address the causes of degradation, rather than the symptoms, and shall be consistent with water quality and resource protection plans prepared, implemented, or adopted by the board, the applicable regional water quality control board, and the California Coastal Commission.

(d) An applicant for funds from the subaccount shall be required to submit to the board a monitoring and reporting plan that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies the nonpoint source or sources of pollution to be prevented or reduced by the project.

(2) Describes the baseline water quality or quality of the environment
 to be addressed.

(3) Describes the manner in which the project will be effective in preventing or reducing pollution and in demonstrating the desired environmental results.

(e) Upon completion of the project, a recipient of funds from the subaccount shall submit a report to the board that summarizes the completed activities and indicates whether the purposes of the project have been met. The report shall include information collected by the recipient in accordance with the project monitoring and reporting plan, including a determination of the effectiveness of the project in preventing or reducing pollution. The board shall make the report available to the public, watershed groups, and federal, state, and local agencies.

(f) If projects include capital costs for construction, those costs shall be identified by the
 project applicant. The grant recipient shall provide a matching contribution for the portion of the project consisting of capital costs for construction, according to the following formula:Capital Cost Project Cost/Capital Cost Match by Recipient$1,000,000 to $5,000,000, inclusive20%$125,000 to $999,999, inclusive15%$1 to $124,999, inclusive10%For the purposes of this subdivision, “capital costs” has the same meaning as “cost” as defined in Section 32025 of the Public Resources Code.

(g) Not more than 25 percent of a grant may be awarded in advance of actual expenditure.

(h) An applicant for funds from the subaccount shall inform the board of any necessary public agency approvals, entitlements, and permits that may be necessary to implement the project. The application shall certify to
 the board, at the appropriate time, that those approvals, entitlements, and permits have been granted.

(i) Where recovery plans for coho salmon, steelhead trout, or other threatened or endangered aquatic species exist, projects funded under this article shall be consistent with those plans, and to the extent feasible, shall seek to implement actions specified in those plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.10.

(a) Sixty percent of the money in the subaccount shall be allocated to projects in the Counties of Riverside, Ventura, Los Angeles, San Diego, Orange, or San Bernardino.

(b) Forty percent of the money in the subaccount shall be allocated to projects in the counties not described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.12.

The board shall provide opportunity for public review and comment in awarding funds pursuant to this article, and may, in consultation with the California Coastal Commission, adopt regulations to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.14.

No project shall receive funds under this article if it receives funds pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 79110).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.15.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, three million dollars ($3,000,000), upon appropriation by the Legislature to the board, shall be allocated by the board to the San Diego County Water Authority for environmental studies and engineering studies for the San Diego Regional Conveyance Facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79148.16.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Seawater Intrusion Control [79149. - 79149.16.]

79149.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) (1) “Eligible seawater intrusion control project” means a project that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The project is necessary to protect groundwater and meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The project is within a basin that is subject to a local groundwater management plan for which a review is completed pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(ii) The project is threatened by seawater intrusion in an area where restrictions on groundwater pumping, a physical solution, or both, are necessary to prevent the destruction of, or irreparable injury to, groundwater quality.

(B) In the case of a project that would provide a substitute water supply, the project is cost-effective when compared to the development of other new sources of water and includes requirements or measures adequate to ensure that the substitute supply will be used in lieu of previously established extractions or diversions of groundwater.

(C) The project complies with applicable water quality standards, policies, and plans.

(2) Eligible projects may include, but are not limited to, water conservation, freshwater well injection, and substitution of groundwater pumping from local surface supplies.

(b) “Local agency” means any city, county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved in water management.

(c) “Subaccount” means the Seawater Intrusion Control Subaccount created by Section 79149.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.2.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Seawater Intrusion Control Subaccount. The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the board for
 loans to local agencies to carry out eligible seawater intrusion control projects and for the purposes described in this article and for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.3.

Unallocated funds remaining in the Seawater Intrusion Control Subaccount in the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund on March 8, 2000, and any funds deposited into that subaccount after that date, shall be transferred to, and all money repaid to the state pursuant to any loan contract executed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 78648) of Chapter 5 of Division 24 shall be deposited in, the subaccount for the purposes of this
 article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.4.

The board may enter into contracts to make loans to local agencies for the purposes set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.6.

Any contract for a loan entered into pursuant to Section 79149.4 may include those provisions determined by the board to be necessary for the purposes of this article and shall include both of the following provisions:

(a) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible seawater intrusion control project.

(b) An agreement by the local agency to proceed expeditiously
 with, and complete, the eligible seawater intrusion control project, commence operation of the project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, and provide for the payment of the local agency’s share of the cost of the project, including the principal of, and interest on, the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.8.

(a) A contract for a loan may not provide for a moratorium on the payment of the principal of, or interest on, the loan.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to Section 79149.4 shall be for a period not to exceed 20 years.

(c) The board may enter into a contract for a loan amount that equals up to 100 percent of the total eligible cost of design and
 construction of an eligible seawater intrusion control project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.10.

(a) The board shall establish the interest rate for a loan made pursuant to this article at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method.

(b) If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher
 multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent.

(c) The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.12.

All principal and interest payments received pursuant to loan contracts entered into pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.14.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79149.16.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay for both of the following:

(a) To pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(b) For the purposes of Section 79149.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Water Conservation Program [79150. - 79164.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and Declarations [79150. - 79150.]

79150.

The Legislature finds and declares that:
